Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 3 Registration

Cross references. —

As to registration, see art. 6, § 12, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 178 to 194.

State voting rights of residents of military establishments, 34 ALR2d 1193.

Right of married women to use maiden surname, 67 ALR3d 1266.

Voting rights of persons mentally incapacitated, 80 ALR3d 1116.

Validity of college or university regulation of political or voter registration activity in student housing facilities, 39 ALR4th 1137.

Validity, construction and application of 42 U.S.C. § 1973i(c) making it federal offense with respect to federal elections to give false information in registering or voting or to pay or accept payment for registering or voting, 23 ALR Fed 463.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 47 to 72.

§ 22-3-101.
When required; prior registration in effect.

Registration is required before a person may vote.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Any voter legally registered prior to May 25, 1973, is considered registered under the Election Code enacted in 1973.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-17; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to registration of voters, see art. 6, § 12, Wyo. Const.

§ 22-3-102.
Qualifications; temporary registration.

A person may register to vote not less than fourteen (14) days before an election, at any election specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii) or as provided by W.S.

22-3-117

, who satisfies the following qualifications:

He is a citizen of the United States;

He will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on the day of the next general election provided he shall not be permitted to vote until he has attained the age of eighteen (18);

He is a bona fide resident of Wyoming as determined in accordance with W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxx);

He is not currently adjudicated mentally incompetent;

He has not been convicted of a felony, or if convicted has had his civil or voting rights restored.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

An absent uniformed services or an overseas citizen voter who is qualified to register by mail, to request an absentee ballot, and to vote in Wyoming is entitled to register by mail annually using the Federal Postcard Application for the purpose of voting in any election during the calendar year for which the voter registered. The voter’s name shall not appear on the permanent official registry list until the voter has registered as provided in W.S.

22-3-103

and

22-3-104

.

The secretary of state is authorized to provide for the verification of certain voter registration data in accordance with the following:

The secretary of state and the director of the department of transportation shall enter into an agreement to match voter registration data with information maintained by the department regarding driver’s licenses, in order to verify the information provided on applications for voter registration;

The secretary of state and the attorney general shall enter into an agreement to compare data in the voter registration system with information maintained by the division of criminal investigation regarding state felony convictions in order to deny voter registration to, and remove from voter registration lists, individuals who are not qualified electors;

The secretary of state and the director of the department of health shall enter into an agreement to match information in the voter registration system with death records in the office of vital records services within the department of health in order to remove names of deceased individuals from voter registration lists;

The secretary of state, the state board of parole and the department of corrections shall enter into an agreement to match information in the voter registration system with records regarding restoration of voting rights maintained by the state board of parole or the department of corrections in order to verify voter qualifications;

The secretary of state and the supreme court shall enter into an agreement to match information in the voter registration system with other records in order to generate jury lists.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-18; 1993, ch. 172, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2003, ch. 132, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, §§ 2, 4; 2009, ch. 100, § 2, ch. 139, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 163, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of electors, see art. 6, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to when residence not lost by reason of absence, see art. 6, § 7, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment

repealed former (b), pertaining to absentee ballots, and added (d) and (e).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii) inserted “general” preceding “election” and added “provided he shall not be permitted to vote until he has attained the age of eighteen (18)” thereafter, and added (e)(v).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 139, § 1, effective July 1, 2009,
inserted “and effective January 1, 2011 fourteen (14) days” preceding “before an election” in (a).

While neither of the amendments gave effect to the other, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) deleted “thirty (30) days, and effective January 1, 2011” following “not less than;” and in (d) deleted “or as many as the next two (2) federal election cycles” following “one (1) election”, and substituted “election” for “elections” following “special federal,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence of (d), inserted “cycle,” and deleted “but thereafter the voter's name shall be removed from the temporary registration list which shall be maintained as a segregated part of the voter registration list.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment.

effective January 1, 2016, in (e)(iv), substituted “state, the state board” for “state and the state board”, inserted “and the department of corrections” and inserted “or the department of corrections”.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) substituted “by mail annually using” for “by mail using” and “voting in any election during the calendar year for which the voter registered” for “voting in one (1) election cycle, including a primary, general or special federal election.”

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Residence or domicile of teacher for purpose of voting, 98 ALR2d 488; 44 ALR3d 797.

Residence of students for voting purposes, 44 ALR3d 797.

§ 22-3-103.
Furnishing of oath forms; contents thereof.

The county clerk shall furnish voter registration oath forms to registry agents which forms shall require the following voter information from the applicant:

His full legal name;

His current residence address or if living temporarily in another state or nation, his last residence address in Wyoming;

His postal address if different from his residence address;

His date of birth;

Acceptable identification as defined pursuant to W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix);

Either:

The applicant’s Wyoming driver’s license number, or if the applicant has no current, valid Wyoming driver’s license, a statement to that effect and the last four (4) digits of the applicant’s social security number, or if the applicant has neither, a statement to that effect; or

A tribal identification card issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone tribe of Wyoming, the Northern Arapaho tribe of Wyoming or other federally recognized Indian tribe that contains the applicant’s Wyoming driver’s license number, if the applicant has a Wyoming driver’s license, and the last four (4) digits of the applicant’s social security number.

His political party affiliation, if any.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 3, § 3.

Following the provision of the information required in subsection (a) of this section, the form shall require the applicant’s signature in full below the following oath:

I, , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the United States; that I am a bona fide resident of the state of Wyoming and this county; that if registered in another county or state, I hereby request that my registration be withdrawn; that I will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next election; that I am not currently adjudicated a mentally incompetent person, that I have not been convicted of a felony, or if I have been convicted of a felony, I have had my civil or voting rights restored by a competent authority; and that the voter registration information contained herein is true and accurate to my best knowledge and belief. (Signature in full of applicant) Subscribed and affirmed or sworn to before me by this day of , (year). (Signature and title of registry agent or person authorized to administer oaths)

Click to view

Persons in the uniformed services and overseas citizens, as specified in W.S.

22-3-117

, shall swear or affirm to the oath under the penalty of perjury. The oath does not require the signature of an oath-taking officer.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-19; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1985, ch. 143, § 1; ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2003, ch. 132, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2010, ch. 3, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 56, § 1, effective March 12, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “political party and the number of my current, valid Wyoming driver's license is
. . . . . , or I have no valid Wyoming driver's license and the last four digits of my social security number are
. . . . . , or I have no valid Wyoming driver's license or social security number” for “political party and my social security number (optional) is
. . . . . ”; and in (b) substituted “uniformed services” for “military.”

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, specifying the information required of the registrant in (a); and simplifying the form and recasting it as (b).

The 2008 amendment,

inserted “legal” in (a)(i).

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (a)(viii) which read: “The date he became a resident of the county.” and made a related change.

The 2020 amendment,

added the introductory language of (a)(vi); designated former (a)(vi) as (a)(vi)(A), substituted “The applicant’s” for “His,” “if the applicant” for “if he” twice, “four (4) digits of the applicant’s social” for “four 4) digits of his social,” and made a related change; and added (a)(vi)(B).

Laws 2020, ch. 56, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

in the form in (b), inserted “if registered in another county or state, I hereby request that my registration be withdrawn; that,” and deleted “that I am not
. . . . .
now registered in another county or state.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence in (c), substituted “shall swear” for “may swear.”

Editor's notes. —

Former subsection (b) has been redesignated as subsection (c) at the direction of the legislative service office.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath as applied to voters, 18 ALR2d 268.

§ 22-3-104.
Methods
of verification; signing oath; time for proving eligibility; registration locations.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 94 § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

An applicant may only register to vote in person or by mail at which time he shall provide the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a) and sign the registration oath as required by W.S. 22-3-103(b).

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 110, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 110, § 2.

A person shall be registered to vote as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 2.

Registration is effective:

At the polls for the purpose of voting. Upon verification of the information, the voter shall continue to be registered. Upon failure of verification, the voter’s registration shall be revoked in accordance with W.S.

22-3-105

;

For registration, other than at the polls, after the voter registration information has been entered onto the voter registration system and verified.

On election day, applicants attempting to register who lack the proof required under this section shall be offered provisional ballots in accordance with W.S.

22-15-105

and permitted until the close of business on the day following the election to present documentation to the county clerk establishing their eligibility to register and to vote in the precinct.

An applicant may register to vote in person:

In his proper polling place at any election specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii); or

In the office of the county clerk or city clerk in the principal office building of the county or city in the presence of the registry agent.

A county or city clerk may establish and maintain registration facilities in a public area owned or occupied by a political subdivision or governmental institution, agency or entity, after giving not less than two (2) days notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and by posting such notice in such clerk’s office. The requirements of subsection (h) of this section regarding the place of registration shall not apply to a person registering in accordance with this subsection.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-20; 1993, ch. 172, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2004, ch. 94, §§ 2, 4; 2005, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, §§ 1, 2, effective March 10, 2014.

The
2004 amendment,

by ch. 94, §§ 2 and 4, repealed former (a) and (b), pertaining to signing, subscribing and delivering the registration oath, added (d) through (h), redesignated former (d) as (j), and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (d), deleting the specific registration requirements and instead referring the registrant to W.S.

23-3-103

, and rewrote (f), modifying duties of election officials; and repealed former (e), which provided that any person authorized to administer oaths would be considered a registry agent for the purposes of registering by mail.

The 2008 amendment,

in the first sentence of (j), substituted “area” for “building”, deleted “and on the front door of such public building” at the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2014 amendment,

repealed former (f)(i) which read: “Registration before the secretary of state
has certified that the voter registration system is operational is effective upon receipt and acceptance by the county clerk or election
judge of the completed and signed registration oath subscribed by
the registry agent or by a person authorized to administer oaths if
the voter is registering by mail”; and
in (f)(ii), deleted “after the secretary of state has certified that the voter registration system is operational.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

For article, "Wyoming Election Law: Proposals for Reform”, see12 Wyo. L. Rev. 29 (2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is “public place” within requirement of posting of election notices, 90 ALR2d 1210.

§ 22-3-105.
Investigation of voter qualifications; striking names from registry; criteria; notice; appeal.

The county clerk may investigate the qualifications of any voter registration, when he has reasonable cause to believe that the voter may be unqualified. The county clerk shall, after a thorough investigation, strike from the voter registration lists the name of any person who is not qualified to be registered.

Among the criteria the county clerk may use in determining the qualifications of any person to be registered are the following:

Location of dwelling of registrant and family;

Occupation and location of employment;

Location of vehicle registration;

Wyoming driver’s license or tribal identification card that meets the requirements of W.S. 22-3-103(a)(vi)(B);

Property owned;

Any other residency qualifications either provided by law or deemed reasonable by the clerk to render a judicious determination.

The clerk shall give immediate written notice by certified return receipt mail to any person who is denied registration.

Any person who is denied registration has the right to appeal to a circuit court within the county or to the district court within five (5) days of the date of the notification. The appellant shall not be required to obtain legal counsel for any such appeal.

The court shall hear and decide any such appeal within five (5) days from the date the appeal is received.

The provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act are not applicable to voter registration appeals.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-21; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2020 ch. 56, § 1, effective March 12, 2020.

The 2004 amendment

in (d) deleted “justice of the peace” following “right to appeal to a.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “voter registration lists” for “registry lists.”

The 2020 amendment,

in the introductory language of (b) substituted “the county clerk” for “he”; and in (b)(iv), substituted “Wyoming driver's license or tribal identification card that meets the requirements of W.S. 22-3-103(a)(vi)(B)” for “Driver's license.”

Laws 2020, ch. 56, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to computing time in which to appeal, see §

22-2-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion or inclusion of terminal Sunday or holiday in computing time for taking or perfecting appeal from decision of electoral board, 61 ALR2d 482.

§ 22-3-106.
Request for voter registration withdrawal; form.

If a voter registration applicant affirms that he is registered in another county or state, the registry agent shall require that the applicant make a written withdrawal of voter registration from another county or state on the Wyoming registration application.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-22; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2010, ch. 3, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the second sentence, substituted “cause notice to be sent” for “mail the form.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “make a written withdrawal of voter registration from another county or state on the Wyoming registration application” for “complete and sign a ‘Request for Voter Registration Withdrawal’ form,” and deleted the former second sentence, introductory clause and the ‘Request for Voter Registration Withdrawal’ form.

§ 22-3-107.
Information registry agent may enter on registration form.

The registry agent may determine and enter on a voter registration oath form the voting district number, polling precinct number, school district number, house district number and senate district number after the applicant signs the form.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-23; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-3-108.
Official registry list information.

The official registry list shall contain at least the following information as to each registered elector:

Name in full;

Residence by street number and name, if any;

Voting district and precinct numbers;

Party affiliation, if declared;

House and senate district numbers;

Date of birth; and

The elector’s Wyoming driver’s license number, or if the elector has no Wyoming driver’s license, one (1) of the following unique identifying numbers:

The last four (4) digits of the elector’s social security number, or if the elector also has no social security number;

A unique identifying number generated by the state.

The official registry list may contain the following information as to each registered elector:

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 4.

County of residence;

Date of registration;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 4.

Name of municipal corporation of residence, if any;

Number of school district of residence;

Mailing address;

Gender; and

Telephone number, if any.

The county clerk may maintain within the election records the social security numbers of registered electors for identification purposes.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-24; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2004, ch. 94, §§ 2, 4.

The
2004 amendment,

by ch. 94, §§ 2 and 4, added (a)(vi) and (vii); repealed former (b)(i), pertaining to social security number, and former (b)(iv), pertaining to date of birth, and added (b)(viii) and (ix); in (c) deleted “which information shall not be a part of the public record” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 22-3-109.
Certification and transmittal of poll lists; posting of registry lists.

Not less than ten (10) days before any election, the county clerk shall certify and transmit to the officer in charge of each election at his request the necessary poll lists for the precincts or areas involved in the election. Not less than ten (10) days prior to the primary and general elections the county clerks shall upon request deliver up to three (3) poll lists for each precinct in the county to the county chairman of each political party in the respective counties.

The county clerk shall publicly post in a prominent place at the county courthouse one (1) copy of the registry list for each precinct.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-25; Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 2; 1978, ch. 38, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), twice substituted “poll list” for “registry list,” and substituted “deliver” for“ mail”; and in (b), substituted “registry list” for “list.”

The 2014 amendment,

in the last sentence of (a), inserted “upon request,” inserted “up to,” and deleted “copies of the.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-3-110.
Expense of preparing poll lists.

The expense of preparing poll lists required by law to be provided by the county clerk in combined statewide political subdivision elections, shall be shared on an equitable basis by the governmental entities participating in the election. The expense of preparing other poll lists shall be paid by the entity holding the election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-26; 2005, ch. 110, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice substituted “poll lists” for “registry lists.”

§ 22-3-111.
Preparation and contents of pollbooks.

The county clerk shall prepare the necessary pollbooks for statewide and political subdivision elections held on the same date. The pollbooks shall contain the poll lists.

Pollbooks shall be prepared for special district elections by the officials in charge of such elections. The county clerk shall furnish poll lists as required and requested by such officials.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-27; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “poll lists” for “registry lists” in (a) and (b).

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote (a), which formerly read: “The county clerk shall prepare the necessary pollbooks for each precinct for statewide and political subdivision elections held on the same date. The precinct pollbooks shall contain the poll lists, the oaths of judges of election, certificate of ballots, and a tally sheet if ballots are hand counted. On the cover of the pollbook shall be printed the words ‘Pollbook’, the election and date of the election, the voting district and precinct numbers.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-3-112.
Pollbook distribution; entering information.

Before the polls open, the county clerk shall distribute the pollbooks to the judges of election in the respective polling places. The judges of election shall enter in pollbooks all information required by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-28; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence, substituted “pollbooks” for “precinct pollbooks” and “polling places” for “precincts.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-3-113.
Disposition of pollbooks after polls close.

After the polls are closed, judges of the election shall make printed pollbooks agree and shall return one (1) pollbook to the county clerk.

When electronic pollbooks are used, they shall be returned to the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957 § 22.1-29; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “and one (1) copy of the registry list, which may be one and the same” after the first reference to “poll list,” and substituted “poll list” or a variant for “pollbook” or a variant throughout.

The 2015 amendment,

designated the existing provisions as (a); rewrote (a); and added (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-3-114.
Notification by registered elector of name or address change.

A registered elector who changes his name or changes his residence from one address to another within the same county shall notify the county clerk of the change, including in the notification the name, address, precinct and social security number (optional) under which registered and the nature of the change.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-30; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2.

Referendum petitions. —

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters whose addresses stated on the petition differed from addresses in the county clerk's voter registration list because one could lawfully move to a different address within the city without updating his or her address and still be a legally qualified elector registered in the city. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters who moved within the city without notifying the county clerk because this did not automatically disqualify the voters, as (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 22-3-115(a) stated the criteria for cancelling a voter's registration, and, (2) under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-3-116

, a registration could not be cancelled automatically. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of married woman to use maiden surname, 67 ALR3d 1266.

§ 22-3-115.
Grounds for cancellation of registration.

A registered elector’s registration shall be cancelled for any one (1) of the following reasons:

Failure to vote in any general election;

Death;

Removal of residence from the county or state more than thirty (30) days prior to an election;

Disqualification to vote;

Receipt of notification that the elector has registered to vote in another jurisdiction;

Upon written request of the elector.

A registered elector’s registration shall not be cancelled if the elector in any general election requested an absentee ballot which was rejected.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-31; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Referendum petitions. —

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters who moved within the city without notifying the county clerk because this did not automatically disqualify the voters, as (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 22-3-115(a) stated the criteria for cancelling a voter's registration, and, (2) under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-3-116

, a registration could not be cancelled automatically. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters whose addresses stated on the petition differed from addresses in the county clerk's voter registration list because one could lawfully move to a different address within the city without updating his or her address and still be a legally qualified elector registered in the city. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

Cross references. —

As to persons excluded from franchise, see art. 6, § 6, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “conviction” within constitutional provisions disfranchising one convicted of crime, 36 ALR2d 1238.

Effect of conviction under federal law, or law of another state or country, on right to vote, 39 ALR3d 303.

§ 22-3-116.
Notice of intent to cancel registration.

When the county clerk has information that a registration should be cancelled, he shall mail a notice of intent to cancel to the elector at his address on the registry list stating the reason for cancellation. The notice shall state that cancellation shall occur within twenty (20) days unless the elector asks that his name remain on the registry list. A copy of the notice of cancellation shall be retained by the county clerk for three (3) years. A notice is not required if the clerk has received a receipt of notification that the elector has registered to vote in another jurisdiction or if the elector requested cancellation in writing.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-32; Laws 1974, ch. 24,§ 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Referendum petitions. —

It was error for a city clerk to reject signatures on a municipal referendum petition of voters who moved within the city without notifying the county clerk because this did not automatically disqualify the voters, as (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 22-3-115(a) stated the criteria for cancelling a voter's registration, and, (2) under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-3-116

, a registration could not be cancelled automatically. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 22-3-117.
Absentee registration generally; use of federal postcard.

Notwithstanding any other section or provision in this chapter, any citizen of the United States who is a resident of Wyoming may apply for registration by providing the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a) and acceptable identification to and completing and subscribing, the form of voter registration oath prescribed by W.S. 22-3-103(b) before any person authorized by law to administer oaths. Each county clerk shall furnish the voter registration oath forms. The applicant shall mail or return the completed voter registration oath form to the county clerk in the county in which the applicant resides. In order to vote in the next election, the application must be received in the county clerk’s office before the close of registration for that election, or:

Be received by mail or email and processed by the county clerk during the closed period described in W.S. 22-3-102(a) if it is accompanied by an absentee ballot request for elections where a voter may register at the polls;

Be made at the county clerk’s office during the closed period described in W.S. 22-3-102(a) if the voter simultaneously votes at the county clerk’s office; or

Be made and processed at the absentee polling place during the closed period described in W.S. 22-3-102(a) if the voter simultaneously votes at the absentee polling place established for that purpose pursuant to W.S.

22-9-125

.

Under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff (2002) the following persons shall be allowed to simultaneously register and make application for an absentee ballot through the use of the Federal Postcard Application (FPCA), provided those persons are residents of this state or in the case of overseas citizens, they were last domiciled in Wyoming immediately prior to their departure from the United States and are not registered to vote in any other jurisdiction:

Members of the uniformed services and their spouses and dependents residing with them;

Overseas citizens and their spouses and dependents residing with them;

Citizens temporarily residing outside of the United States, and their spouses and dependents residing with them; and

Any other person to whom federal law requires this privilege be extended.

Annual registration through the Federal Postcard Application constitutes temporary registration for the purpose of voting in any election during the calendar year for which the voter registered, and the registration of such a registrant shall be maintained as provided in W.S. 22-3-102(d). The Federal Postcard Application shall be accepted if completed and signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury.

If any person specified in subsection (b) of this section desires permanent registration, that person shall provide the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a) and subscribe to the voter registration oath prescribed by W.S. 22-3-103(b). The oath shall be self-administered under penalty of perjury and notwithstanding W.S.

22-3-104

does not require the signature of an oath-taking official.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-33; Laws 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1985, ch. 143, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2009, ch. 139, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “Uniformed and Overseas Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff (2002)” for “Military and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff (1986) or any subsequent federal laws of similar purpose,” in (b)(i) substituted “uniformed services” for “armed forces and merchant marine,” and in (b)(iii) deleted “and the District of Columbia” following “United States”; in (c) rewrote the first sentence which formerly read: “Registration through the Federal Postcard Application constitutes temporary registration for the current election year only and the registration of such a registrant shall not be entered on the permanent registration records of the county clerk”; in (d) inserted “notwithstanding W.S.

22-3-104

” following “under penalty of perjury and”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) and (d) inserted “provide the information required by W.S.

22-3-103

(a) and” or a variant, and substituted “W.S.

22-3-103

(b)” for “W.S. 22-3-103”; and additionally in (a) deleted “which person is considered a registry agent for this purpose” following “administer oaths.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added designation (a)(i) and substituted “Be received by mail and processed by the county clerk during the closed period described in W.S. 22-3-102(a) if it is accompanied” for “Be accompanied”; and added (a)(ii) and (a)(iii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “or as many as the next two (2) federal election cycles” following “one (1) election,” substituted “election” for “elections” following “special federal,”
and made stylistic changes in (c).

The 2014 amendment,

inserted “cycle” in (c).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “by mail or email” for “by mail”; and in (c) substituted “Annual registration” for “Registration” and “voting in any election during the calendar year for which the voter registered” for “voting in one (1) election cycle, including a primary, general or special federal election.”